District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

5-1133

Adjudication of complaints; rules and regulations; action by Chief of Police.

Repealed.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-158, § 4, 27 DCR 5127
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 803(a), 42 DCR 3684

History

1981 Ed., § 4-903.

Prior Codifications

For effective date of repeal of §§ 5-1131 to 5-1140, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-1131.

Effective Dates